Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
TEACHING FELLOWSHIP PROGRAMS

23-3.9-201 to 23-3.9-207. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part repealed, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1821, § 5, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This part 2 was added in 2018 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2019. For the text of this part 2 prior to 2019, consult the 2018 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.